tests/cmd/check-spelling/data/rules.aff
#
# Copyright (c) 2019 Intel Corporation
#
# SPDX-License-Identifier: Apache-2.0
#

SET UTF-8

# Add the following characters so they are accepted as part of a word
WORDCHARS 0123456789'

# Disable hyphenation
BREAK 0

# plural
SFX A N 3
SFX A 0 s [^x]
SFX A 0 es x
SFX A y ies

# possession
SFX B N 1
SFX B 0 's

# past tense
SFX C N 4
SFX C 0 d e
SFX C 0 ed [rt]
SFX C 0 ped p
SFX C 0 ged g

# present continuous
SFX D N 3
SFX D 0 ging g
SFX D 0 ing [rt]
SFX D e ing e
